Hawaii statutes.
§328-17.6 Out-of-state prescriptions.
(a) An out-of-state practitioner may issue a written, oral, or electronic
prescription within the confines of the practitioner's license and in
accordance with Hawaii laws and rules. An oral or electronic prescription
shall be issued by the out-of-state practitioner or the prescriber's authorized
agent and received only by a pharmacist; provided that a medical oxygen order
may be received by a medical oxygen distributor.

(b) An out-of-state pharmacy may transfer prescription
information for refilling purposes and an out-of-state medical oxygen
distributor may transfer prescription information for the purpose of refilling
a medical oxygen order.

(c) Any pharmacist or medical oxygen
distributor who fills or refills a prescription from an out-of-state
practitioner shall:

(1) Note the following on the prescription record:
the out-of-state practitioner's full name, address, and telephone number;

(2) Be responsible for validating and verifying the
practitioner's prescriptive authority by virtue of a valid out-of-state
license, a Drug Enforcement Administration registration number, or other
measures as appropriate; and

(3) Except as otherwise
authorized for expedited partner therapy in section 453-52, demand proper
identification from the person whose name appears on the prescription prior to
filling the prescription, in addition to complying with any identification
procedures established by the department for filling and refilling an
out-of-state prescription.

(d) Before refilling a transferred
out-of-state prescription, a pharmacist or medical oxygen distributor shall:

(1) Except as otherwise
authorized for expedited partner therapy in section 453-52, advise the
person whose name appears on the prescription that the prescription on file at
the originating out-of-state pharmacy or medical oxygen distributor may be
canceled; and

(2) Record all information required to be on a
prescription, including:

(A) The date of issuance of the original
prescription;

(B) The number of refills authorized on the
original prescription;

(C) The date the original prescription was
dispensed;

(D) The number of valid refills remaining and
the date of the last refill;

(E) The out-of-state pharmacy's or
out-of-state medical oxygen distributor's name, telephone number, and address,
and the original prescription number or control number from which the
prescription information was transferred; and

(F) The name of the transferor pharmacist or
the medical oxygen distributor's agent.

(e) A pharmacist or medical oxygen distributor
who fills or refills an out-of-state prescription shall be responsible if the
prescription is not written in the form prescribed by Hawaii laws and rules.

(f) An out-of-state prescription record shall
state the date of filling or refilling and, except as
otherwise authorized for expedited partner therapy in section 453-52, the
local address of the person whose name appears on the prescription.

(g) All transferred prescriptions shall be
maintained for a period of five years from the date of filling or refilling.
Filled out-of-state prescriptions shall be kept on file for five years. The
department may establish additional recordkeeping and reporting procedures for
filled and refilled out-of-state prescriptions.

(h) Nothing in this section shall be construed
to relieve any person from any requirement, prescribed by or under authority of
law with respect to drugs now included or that may hereafter be included within
the classifications of controlled substances as defined in the applicable
federal and state laws relating to controlled substances including but not
limited to chapter 329. [L 1992, c 177, pt of §1; am L 1993, c 69, §1; am L
1994, c 79, §1; am L 2000, c 83, §4; am L 2001, c 124, §4; am L 2003, c 56, §3;
am L 2013, c 250, §5]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next